Idaho, session 2026, S1369.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 5-404, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
repealed.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 4, Title 5, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 5-404, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
5-404. OTHER ACTIONS -- VENUE -- EXCEPTIONS. (1) Except as otherwise
provided by this chapter or other provisions of law, a plaintiff shall bring
an action in the county in which:
(a) The cause of action arises; or
(b) Any defendant resides at the commencement of the action.
(2) If none of the defendants reside in the state of Idaho at the time of
the cause of the action, or prior to the filing of the complaint, the action
may be brought in any county, which the plaintiff may designate in the com-
plaint.
(3) Actions against life or fire insurance companies may be filed in the
county where the death occurred or the loss was sustained.
(4) Actions against any corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Idaho shall be filed in any county where the defendant has its prin-
cipal place of business or in the county in which the cause of action arose.
(5) Nothing in this chapter shall limit the power of the court to change
the place of trial, as otherwise provided by law.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.